src/fst/morphology/affixes/adpositions.lexc
! !!! Postpositions

!! The Erzya language postpositions can be broken into many subgroups
!! according to morphological and semantic criteria

LEXICON PO_POSS-or-END-FOC
!! This allows for possessor indices, word end or focus
 CLT/COP4_OBL ;
 K ;


LEXICON PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3
!! This allows for word end, possessor indices, predication
 K ;
 CLT/COP4_OBL ; 
 OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;


LEXICON PO-IS-ABL
!! postposition that is in ablative case
!! алдо:алдо
+Abl: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

!LEXICON PO-IS-ELA
!! postposition that is in elative case
!! потсто:потсто
!+Ela: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

LEXICON PO-IS-ILL-STEM
!! postposition that is in illative case
!! эземс:эзем
+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
+Ill:%>с K ;

LEXICON PO-IS-ILL-STEM_E2JS
!! postposition that is in illative case
!! эйс:э
+Ill:йз OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
+Ill+Use/NG:зэз OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
+Ill+Dial+Use/NG:з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
+Ill:йс K ;


LEXICON PO_IS_INE
!! postposition that is in inessive case
!! эйсэ:эйсэ, кисэ
+Ine: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-LAT
!!! postposition that is in lative case
!!! ютков:ютков
!+Lat: K ;

!LEXICON PO-IS-LAT-STEM
!! postposition that is in lative case
!! ютков:ютков
!+Lat:%>в K ;

LEXICON PO-IS-LOC
!! postposition that is in locative case
!! ало:ало
+Loc: OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;

!LEXICON PO-IS-PRL
!!! postposition that is in prolative case
!!! перька:перька
!2023_03_21+Prl: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

!!
LEXICON PO-SPAT_
!! postposition that has no continuation пачк
: K ;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-ABL
!! postposition that is in ablative case
!! алдо:алдо
!+Abl: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-ELA
!! postposition that is in elative case
!! потсто:потсто
!+Ela: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-ILL-STEM
!! postposition that is in illative case
!! малас:мала
+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
+Ill:%>с K ;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-ILL-STEM_E2KSHS
!! postposition that is in illative case
!! малас:мала
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Ill:%>с K ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}с K ;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-ILL-STEM_POTS
!! postposition that is in illative case
!! потс:пот
!+Ill:м%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Ill:%>с K ;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-ILL-STEM_E2JS
!! postposition that is in illative case
!! эйс:э
!+Ill:йз OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Ill:зэз OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Ill:йс K ;


LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-INE
!! postposition that is in inessive case
!! потсо:потсо
+Ine: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-LAT-STEM
!! postposition that is in lative case
!! алов:ало
!+Lat: OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Lat:в K ;

!LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-LOC
!! postposition that is in locative case
!! ало:ало
!+Loc: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

LEXICON PO-SPAT-IS-PRL
!! postposition that is in prolative case
!! перька:перька
+Prl: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-CLT/COP-SC3;

LEXICON PR_
: ENDLEX ;

LEXICON PO-TEMP_
+Temp: K ; !!= @CODE@ перть

LEXICON PO-TEMP-IS-ELA
+Ela+Temp: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC ; !!= @CODE@ пингстэ


LEXICON ejs-PO
эйс+Po+Ill:эйс K ;
эйс+Po+Ill:эйз OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
эйсэ+Po+Ine:эйсэ _KUDO-Conjugation ;
эйсэ+Po+Ine:эйсэ OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
эйстэ+Po+Ela:эйстэ _KUDO-Conjugation ;
эйстэ+Po+Ela:эйстэ OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
!2023_03_21эйстэ+Po+Ela:эйстэде OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
эйсэ+Po+Orth/PhonDeriv+Ine:эснэ OBL_PX/DEF_FOLLOWED_BY_END/FOC/COP_OR_K ;
эйстэ+Po+Orth/PhonDeriv+Ela:эстэде OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
марто+Po+Orth/PhonDeriv:маро OBL_PX/DEF_FOLLOWED_BY_END/FOC/COP_OR_K ;

LEXICON PO_MARTO
: OBL_PX/DEF_FOLLOWED_BY_END/FOC/COP_OR_K ;
+Der+Der/MWN: N_KUDO ;


LEXICON PO_KUDO-ILL
+Ill:%>с K ;
+Ill:%>з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

!LEXICON PO_OSH-ILL
!+Ill:%>с K ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

LEXICON PO-SPAT_karsho
: K ;
+Ill:%>з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
+Ine: OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

!LEXICON Postp-karsho
!: ENDLEX ;
!: PossMarker-then-Clt ;
!+Ill:%>з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

!LEXICON vaksso-SPAT
! malaso-SPAT ;
!+Ela:%>%{оеэØ%}%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Conjugation ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с K ;
!+Ine:%>%{оеэØ%}%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Conjugation ;
!+Ill:%>%{оеэØ%}з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

!LEXICON jutkso-SPAT
!+Prl:%>%{оеэØ%}%>Г2а OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
!+Prl:%>%{оеэØ%}%>Г2а _KUDO-Conjugation ;
! langso-SPAT ;

!LEXICON langso-SPAT
!+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Conjugation ;
!+Ill:%>с K ;
!+Lat:%>%{оеэØ%}в K ;
!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} _KUDO-Conjugation ;
!+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
!+Ill:%>О2з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;

!LEXICON PO_KUDO-INE5
!!! malaso:mala
!+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
!+Ill:%>О2з OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;
!+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
!+Prl:%>Г2а OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END/FOC/COP ;
!+Lat:%>в _KUDO-Conjugation ;


! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open 
! to extensive declension
LEXICON POSTP_ ! кис, туртов, кувалт
: K ;

!LEXICON Dat-1Arg
!+Dat: K ;






! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
