src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
келес:келе PO-IS-ILL-STEM  "" ;
алдо:алдо PO-IS-ABL  "alta" ;
ало:ало PO-IS-LOC  "" ;
эземс:эземс PO-IS-ILL-STEM  "asemesta, sijasta, sijaan, tilalle" ;
пингстэ:пингстэ PO-TEMP-IS-ELA  "" ;
лемс:лемс POSTP_  "" ;
кедьсэ:кедьсэ PO-SPAT-IS-INE  "" ;
пачк:пачк PO-SPAT_  "läpi" ;
эйс:эйс PO-IS-ILL-STEM_E2JS  "" ;
вельде:вельде POSTP_  "" ;
кис:кис POSTP_  "" ;
кисэ:кисэ POSTP_  "" ;
коряс:коря PO_KUDO-ILL  "" ;
эзга:эзга PO-SPAT-IS-PRL  "" ;
кувалт:кувалт POSTP_  "" ;
ладсо:ладсо POSTP_  "" ;
перть:перть PO-TEMP_  "läpi" ;
перька:перька PO-SPAT-IS-PRL  "" ;
малава:малава PO-SPAT-IS-PRL  "" ;
малас:мала PO-SPAT-IS-ILL-STEM  "" ;
маласо:маласо PO-SPAT-IS-INE  "" ;
марто:марто PO_MARTO  "kanssa" ;
менгева:менгева POSTP_  "" ;
таркас:таркас POSTP_  "" ;
трокс:трокс POSTP_  "" ;
эземс:эземс POSTP_  "" ;
